cs: Obsah balení vyšívacího rámu: Včetně brašny na přenášení; Včetně svorek / upínacích pásků; Kompletní sada rámu; Včetně extra tyčí/prutů; Pouze rám; Včetně připínáčků/špendlíků; Ostatní
sk-SK: Obsah balenia rámu na vyšívanie: Vrátane prenosnej tašky; Vrátane svoriek/upínacích pásov; Kompletná súprava rámu; Vrátane prídavných líšt/tyčí; Len rám; Vrátane pripináčikov/špendlíkov; Iné
pt-BR: Bastidor para tapeçaria conteúdo: Bolsa de transporte incluída; Grampo/tiras de aderência incluídos; Conjunto completo de moldura; Barras/hastes extras incluídas; Apenas moldura; Tachinhas/alfinetes incluídos; Outro
fr: Contenu du cadre à tapisserie: Sac de transport inclus; Pince/bandes de préhension incluses; Ensemble de cadre complet; Barres/tiges supplémentaires incluses; Cadre uniquement; Punaises/épingles incluses; Autre
th: เนื้อหา Frame เข็ม: มีกระเป๋าหิ้วให้; มีแคลมป์/แถบยึดให้; ชุดเฟรมแบบครบชุด; มีคาน/แท่งเสริมให้; เฟรมเท่านั้น; มีหมุด/เข็มหมุดให้; อื่นๆ
en: Needlepoint frame contents: Carrying bag included; Clamp/grip strips included; Complete frame set; Extra bars/rods included; Frame only; Tacks/pins included; Other
ja: 針先Frameコンテンツ: キャリーバッグ付属; クランプ/グリップストリップ付属; コンプリートフレームセット; 予備バー/ロッド付属; フレームのみ; タック/ピン付属; その他
el: Περιεχόμενα πλαισίου κεντήματος: Περιλαμβάνεται τσάντα μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνονται ταινίες σύσφιξης/αντιολισθητικές; Πλήρες σετ τελάρου; Περιλαμβάνονται επιπλέον μπάρες/ράβδοι; Μόνο τελάρο; Περιλαμβάνονται πινέζες/καρφίτσες; Άλλο
ro-RO: Conținutul cadrului de goblen: Geantă de transport inclusă; Cleme/benzi de prindere incluse; Set complet de ramă; Bare/tije suplimentare incluse; Doar ramă; Pioneze/ace incluse; Altele
da: Indhold i stramajramme: Bæretaske medfølger; Klemme/gribestrimler medfølger; Komplet rammesæt; Ekstra stænger medfølger; Kun ramme; Stifter/nåle medfølger; Andet
nb: Innhold for nålepunktramme: Bæreveske inkludert; Klemme/gripebånd inkludert; Komplett rammesett; Ekstra stenger/rør inkludert; Kun ramme; Stifter/nåler inkludert; Annet
pl: Zawartość ramy needlepoint: Zawiera torbę transportową; Zawiera zaciski/paski chwytne; Kompletny zestaw ramy; Zawiera dodatkowe drążki/pręty; Tylko rama; Zawiera pinezki/szpilki; Inne
sv: Needlepointram – innehåll: Bärväska ingår; Klämmor/grepplister ingår; Komplett ramset; Extra stänger/stavar ingår; Endast ram; Häftstift/knappnålar ingår; Övrigt
it: Contenuto del telaio per mezzo punto: Borsa di trasporto inclusa; Morsetto/strisce antiscivolo inclusi; Set di telaio completo; Barre/aste aggiuntive incluse; Solo telaio; Puntine/spilli inclusi; Altro
ru: Комплектация рамы для гобеленовой вышивки: Сумка для переноски в комплекте; Зажим/крепежные ленты в комплекте; Полный комплект рамки; Дополнительные планки/стержни в комплекте; Только рамка; Кнопки/булавки в комплекте; Другое
vi: Nội dung khung thêu: Kèm túi đựng; Kèm dải kẹp/dải cố định; Bộ khung hoàn chỉnh; Kèm thanh nối phụ; Chỉ có khung; Kèm đinh ghim/kim gài; Khác
hr-HR: Sadržaj okvira za platno za vezenje: Uključena torba za nošenje; Uključene stezaljke / ljepljive trake; Potpuni komplet okvira; Uključene dodatne šipke/štapovi; Samo okvir; Uključeni čavlići/pribadače; Ostalo
zh-CN: 绒绣框架内容: 含便携袋; 含夹钳/抓力条; 完整框架套装; 含额外杆/棒; 仅框架; 含图钉/别针; 其他
ko: 니들포인트 프레임 구성품: 운반용 가방 포함; 클램프/그립 스트립 포함; 컴플리트 프레임 세트; 여분 바/로드 포함; 프레임 전용; 압정/핀 포함; 기타
lt-LT: Gobeleno rėmo komplektacija: Pridedamas nešiojimo krepšys; Pridedami spaustukai / kibios juostos; Pilnas rėmų rinkinys; Pridedami papildomi strypai; Tik rėmas; Pridedami smeigtukai; Kita
nl: Stramienraam inhoud: Inclusief draagtas; Inclusief klem-/gripstrips; Complete frameset; Inclusief extra staven/stokken; Alleen raam; Inclusief punaises/spelden; Anders
pt-PT: Conteúdo da moldura de bordado: Saco de transporte incluído; Grampo/tiras de aderência incluídos; Conjunto de estrutura completo; Barras/varetas extra incluídas; Apenas estrutura; Tachas/alfinetes incluídos; Outro
sl-SI: Vsebina okvirja za gobelin: Vključuje torbo za prenašanje; Vključene sponke/trakovi za oprijem; Celoten komplet okvirja; Vključene dodatne palice; Samo okvir; Vključeni risalni žebljički/bucike; Drugo
tr: Goblen çerçevesi içeriği: Taşıma çantası dahil; Kelepçe/tutucu şeritler dahil; Komple çerçeve seti; Ekstra çubuklar/miller dahil; Yalnızca çerçeve; Raptiyeler/iğneler dahil; Diğer
de: Inhalt des Needlepoint-Rahmens: Inklusive Tragetasche; Inklusive Klemmen/Haftstreifen; Komplettes Rahmenset; Inklusive extra Stangen/Stäbe; Nur Rahmen; Inklusive Reißzwecken/Nadeln; Sonstiges
fi: Kirjontakankaan kehyksen sisältö: Kantokassi sisältyy; Puristimet/tarraliuskat sisältyvät; Täydellinen kehyssetti; Ylimääräisiä tankoja/keppejä sisältyy; Vain kehys; Nastat/neulat sisältyvät; Muu
hu: Gobelinkeret tartalma: Hordtáskával; Szorítóval/tapadócsíkkal; Teljes keretkészlet; Extra rudakkal; Csak keret; Rajzszögekkel/tűkkel; Egyéb
bg-BG: Съдържание на рамката за гоблен: Включена чанта за носене; Включени скоби/захващащи ленти; Пълен комплект рамка; Включени допълнителни пръчки; Само рамка; Включени кабърчета/карфици; Друго
zh-TW: 針繡框內容: 含手提袋; 含夾具/防滑條; 完整繡繃套裝; 含額外桿/棒; 僅繡繃; 含圖釘/大頭針; 其他
es: Contenido del bastidor de bordado: Bolsa de transporte incluida; Abrazadera/tiras de agarre incluidas; Set de bastidor completo; Barras/varillas extra incluidas; Solo bastidor; Tachuelas/alfileres incluidos; Otro